Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-171
Bessey Memorial Fund; income; use.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall, as the Bessey Memorial Fund is collected, cause to be paid and distributed the income derived from the fund annually to such other of the widows and dependents of deceased professors as shall then have acceptably served the university for a period of at least twenty-five years. In the selection of beneficiaries among whom distribution of the surplus shall be made, the Board of Regents shall exercise its best judgment, taking into consideration all the facts and circumstances of the case.

Laws 1917, c. 239, § 6, p. 578;

C.S.1922, § 6784;

C.S.1929, § 84-174;

R.S.1943, § 85-171;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 32.